Utah statutes.
59-2-1204.   Renter's and homeowner's credits authorized -- No interest
allowed.
(1)  If a claimant who owns a residence files an application for a homeowner's
credit under Section 59-2-1206 and meets the requirements of this part, the
claimant's property tax liability for the calendar year is equal to property
taxes accrued.
(2) (a)  A claimant meeting the requirements of this part may claim in any
year either a renter's credit under Section 59-2-1209, a homeowner's credit as
provided under Section 59-2-1208, or both.
(b)  If a claimant who owns a residence claims a credit under Subsection
(2)(a), the credit shall be applied against the claimant's property taxes
accrued.
(3)  Interest is not allowed on any payment made to a renter's or homeowner's
credit claimant under this part.
